Hawaii statutes.
§660-32 Remanded, when. If the person
is lawfully imprisoned or restrained, and is not entitled to be admitted to
bail, he shall be remanded to the person or officer having lawful authority to
detain him. [L 1870, c 32, §24; RL 1925, §2755; RL 1935, §4340; RL 1945,
§10381; RL 1955, §239-32; HRS §660-32; am L 1972, c 90, §5(t)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next